Utah statutes.
78B-14-614.   Notice to issuing tribunal of modification.
Within 30 days after issuance of a modified child support order, the party
obtaining the modification shall file a certified copy of the order with the
issuing tribunal that had continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over the earlier
order, and in each tribunal in which the party knows the earlier order has
been registered.  A party who obtains the order and fails to file a certified
copy is subject to appropriate sanctions by a tribunal in which the issue of
failure to file arises.  The failure to file does not affect the validity or
enforceability of the modified order of the new tribunal having continuing,
exclusive jurisdiction.
